Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 5.2 Mixed Martial Arts

41-5.2-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall mean as follows:

“Choke holds” means any hold that impairs the flow of blood or oxygen to the brain. There are many chokes, including the rear naked choke, the guillotine, and the triangle choke.

“Cut man” means the person who helps stop the flow of blood from a fighter’s cuts by applying coagulants.

“Eye gouge” means digging the fingers in and around the opponent’s eye.

“Fishhook” means hooking the fingers into an opponent’s mouth, nostrils, or ears and pulling at them.

“Foot stomps” means stomping on the opponent’s feet trying to damage the instep and fragile foot bones.

“Gi” is the Japanese term for martial arts uniform.

“Guard position” means the position where a fighter is on his back with his opponent between his legs. While this is primarily a defensive position, many submission holds are possible.

“Head-butt” means using the head to strike the opponent.

“Joint-lock” means and includes all locks, bars, and holds, that cause enough pain to cause an opponent to submit. Many of these holds can result in serious injury if the opponent does not tap out in time. A few popular submission holds are arm bars, ankle locks, knee bars, and neck cranks.

“KO” means knock out. A fighter is knocked down and unconscious.

“Mixed martial arts” means an event that describes the convergence of techniques from a variety of combative sports disciplines, including boxing, wrestling, judo, jujitsu, kickboxing, and others.

“Mount position” means a dominant position where a fighter straddles his opponent on the ground.

“Mouse” means a dark, swollen bruise around the eye.

“Neck crank” means any hold that impairs the flow of blood or oxygen to the brain. There are many chokes, including the rear naked choke, the guillotine, and the triangle choke.

“NHB” is a term, also referred to as “no holds barred,” which refers to fighting contests with few rules.

“Reversal” means switching from being in a disadvantageous position to a superior one.

“Submission” means when a fighter signals surrender due to a submission hold, choke, or from strikes. The fighter can tap the mat three (3) times or submit verbally.

“Submission holds” means and includes all locks, bars, and holds that cause enough pain to cause an opponent to submit. Many of these holds can result in serious injury if the opponent does not tap out in time.

“Takedown” means and usually occurs when a grappler takes his opponent to the ground.

“Weigh in” means and is used to determine a fighter’s official weight for the bout and is held up to thirty-six (36) hours prior to the event.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 280, § 1.

41-5.2-2.
License required for mixed martial arts exhibitions — Exception.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no mixed-martial-arts match or exhibition for a prize or a purse, or at which an admission fee is charged, either directly or indirectly, in the form of dues or otherwise, shall take place or be conducted in this state unless licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing in accordance with this chapter.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any mixed-martial-arts match or exhibition in which the contestants are amateurs and that is conducted under the supervision and control of:

Any educational institution recognized by the council on postsecondary education and the council on elementary and secondary education of this state; or

Any religious or charitable organization or society engaged in the training of youth and recognized as such by the division of gaming and athletics licensing in this state.

For the purposes of this section, an “amateur” means a person who engages in mixed-martial-arts matches or exhibitions for which no cash prizes are awarded to the participants, and for which the prize competed for, if any, shall not exceed in value the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 13, effective June 27, 2022.

41-5.2-3.
Application for license.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing, at the discretion of its chairperson or other officer charged with the enforcement of this chapter, may require any person applying for a license to furnish information and references as it may desire. Applications for the license shall be accompanied by a fee of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than eight hundred dollars ($800), as the division shall fix. Voluntary or unincorporated associations shall not be entitled to receive a license, and applications in their behalf shall be made in the name of one or more officers thereof.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing is further authorized to request additional information and references as the division may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-4.
Insurance required.

No license issued by the division of gaming and athletics licensing under §

41-5.2-2

shall be valid unless the license holder shall:

Within thirty-six (36) hours of the starting time for the first event in the licensed boxing or sparring match or exhibition, have in force contracts or policies of public liability insurance and other contracts or policies of insurance in amounts as the division shall reasonably require in connection with the conduct of the match or exhibition; and

Within twenty-four (24) hours of the starting time, furnish to the division satisfactory proof that the insurance is in force.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-5.
Drug and H.I.V. testing.

All contestants in a professional, mixed martial arts match shall submit to drug and H.I.V. testing under such rules and regulations and for such drugs as the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall prescribe. The costs of the drug testing shall be paid by the contestant and/or promoter for the mixed martial arts match.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-6.
Health insurance.

All contestants in a mixed martial arts match shall carry such health insurance as the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall prescribe, and shall furnish satisfactory proof of insurance to the division prior to participating in any mixed martial arts match.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-7.
Minimum age of contestants.

No contestant under eighteen (18) years of age shall be permitted to engage in any mixed martial arts match or exhibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-8.
Mixed martial arts uniform rules — Weight classes.

Mixed martial artists shall be divided into the following classes:

Flyweight under 125.9 pounds;

Bantamweight 126 lbs. — 134.9 pounds;

Featherweight 135 lbs. — 145 pounds;

Lightweight over 145 lbs. to 155 pounds;

Welterweight over 155 lbs. to 170 pounds;

Middleweight over 170 lbs. to 185 pounds;

Light heavyweight over 185 lbs. to 205 pounds;

Heavyweight over 205 lbs. to 265 pounds; and

Super heavyweight over 265 pounds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-9.
Uniform rules — Fighting area.

The fighting area canvas shall be no smaller than eighteen feet (18´) by eighteen feet (18´) and no larger than thirty-two feet (32´) by thirty-two feet (32´). The fighting area canvas shall be padded in a manner as approved by the commissioner, with at least one inch layer of foam padding. Padding shall extend beyond the fighting area and over the edge of the platform. No vinyl or other plastic rubberized covering shall be permitted.

The fighting area canvas shall not be more than four feet (4´) above the floor of the building and shall have suitable steps or ramp for use by the participants. Posts shall be made of metal not more than six inches (6") in diameter, extending from the floor of the building to a minimum height of fifty-eight inches (58") above the fighting area canvas, and shall be properly padded in a manner approved by the commissioner.

The fighting area canvas area shall be enclosed by a fence made of such material as will not allow a fighter to fall out or break through it onto the floor or spectators, including, but not limited to, vinyl-coated, chain-link fencing. All metal parts shall be covered and padded in a manner approved by the commission and shall not be abrasive to the contestants.

The fence shall provide two (2) separate entries onto the fighting area canvas.

A ring stool, of a type approved by the commissioner, shall be available for each contestant.

An appropriate number of stools or chairs, of a type approved by the commissioner, shall be available to each contestant’s seconds. Such stools or chairs shall be located near each contestant’s corner.

All stools and chairs used must be thoroughly cleaned or replaced after the conclusion of each bout.

For each bout, the promoter shall provide a clean water bucket and a clean plastic water bottle in each corner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-10.
Uniform rules — Hand bandage specifications.

In all weight classes, the bandages on each contestant’s hand shall be restricted to soft gauze cloth not more than thirteen (13) yards in length and two inches (2") in width, held in place by not more than ten feet (10´) of surgeon’s tape, one inch in width, for each hand.

Surgeon’s adhesive tape shall be placed directly on each hand for protection near the wrist. The tape may cross the back of the hand twice and extend to cover and protect the knuckles when the hand is clenched to make a fist.

The bandages shall be evenly distributed across the hand.

Bandages and tape shall be placed on the contestant’s hands in the dressing room in the presence of the inspector and in the presence of the manager or chief second of his or her opponent.

Under no circumstances are gloves to be placed on the hands of a contestant until the approval of the inspector is received.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-11.
Uniform rules — Mouthpieces.

All contestants are required to wear a mouthpiece during competition. The mouthpiece shall be subject to examination and approval by the attending physician.

The round cannot begin without the mouthpiece in place.

If the mouthpiece is involuntarily dislodged during competition, the referee shall call time, clean the mouthpiece, and reinsert the mouthpiece at the first opportune moment, without interfering with the immediate action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-12.
Uniform rules — Protective equipment.

Male mixed martial artists shall wear a groin protector of their own selection, of a type approved by the commissioner.

Female mixed martial artists are prohibited from wearing groin protectors.

Female mixed martial artists shall wear a chest protector during competition. The chest protector shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-13.
Uniform rules — Gloves.

The gloves shall be new for all main events and in good condition or they must be replaced.

All contestants shall wear either four- (4), five- (5), or six-ounce (6) gloves, supplied by the promoter and approved by the commission. No contestant shall supply their own gloves for participation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-14.
Uniform rules — Apparel.

Each contestant shall wear mixed martial arts shorts, biking shorts, or kick-boxing shorts.

Gi’s or shirts are prohibited during competition.

Shoes are prohibited during competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-15.
Uniform rules — Appearance.

All contestants shall be cleanly shaven immediately prior to competition, except that a contestant may wear a closely cropped mustache.

Hair shall be trimmed or tied back in such a manner as not to interfere with the vision of either contestant or cover any part of a contestant’s face.

Jewelry or piercing accessories are prohibited during competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-16.
Uniform rules — Round length.

Each non-championship mixed martial arts contest shall be three (3) rounds of five (5) minutes duration, with a one-minute rest period between each round.

Each championship mixed martial arts contest shall be give (5) rounds of five (5) minutes duration, with a one-minute rest period between each round.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-17.
Uniform rules — Stopping a contest.

The referee and ringside physician are the sole arbiters of a bout and are the only individuals authorized to enter the fighting area at any time during competition and authorized to stop a contest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-18.
Uniform rules — Judging.

All bouts will be evaluated and scored by three (3) judges.

The ten-point (10) must system will be the standard system of scoring a bout. Under the ten-point (10) must scoring system, ten points (10) must be awarded to the winner of the round and nine (9) points or less must be awarded to the loser, except for a rare even round, which is scored (10-10).

Judges shall evaluate mixed martial arts techniques, such as effective striking, effective grappling, control of the fighting area, effective aggressiveness and defense.

Evaluations shall be made in the order in which the techniques appear in subsection (c), giving the most weight in scoring to effective striking, effective grappling, control of the fighting area, and effective aggressiveness and defense.

Effective striking is judged by determining the total number of legal heavy strikes landed by a contestant.

Effective grappling is judged by considering the amount of successful executions of a legal takedown or reversals. Examples of factors to consider are takedowns from standing position to mount position, passing the guard to mount position, and bottom position fighters using an active, threatening guard.

Fighting area control is judged by determining who is dictating the pace, location, and position of the fight. Examples of factors to consider are countering a grappler’s attempt at takedown by remaining standing and legally striking; taking down an opponent to force a ground fight; creating threatening submission attempts and passing the guard to achieve mount; and creating striking opportunities.

Effective aggressiveness means moving forward and landing a legal strike.

Effective defense means avoiding being struck, taken down, or reversed while countering with offensive attacks.

The following objective scoring criteria shall be utilized by the judges when scoring a round:

A round is to be scored as a 10-10 round when both contestants appear to be fighting evenly and neither contestant shows clear dominance in a round;

A round is to be scored as a 10-9 round when a contestant wins by a close margin, landing the greater number of effective legal strikes, grappling, and other maneuvers;

A round is to be scored as a 10-8 round when a contestant overwhelmingly dominates by striking or grappling in a round;

A round is to be scored as a 10-7 round when a contestant totally dominates by striking or grappling in the round.

Judges shall use a sliding scale and recognize the length of time the fighters are either standing or on the ground, as follows:

If the mixed martial artists spent a majority of a round on the canvas, then:

Effective grappling is weighed first; and

Effective striking is then weighed.

If the mixed martial artists spent a majority of a round standing, then:

Effective striking is weighed first; and

Effective grappling is then weighed.

If a round ends with a relatively even amount of standing and canvas fighting, striking and grappling are weighed equally.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-19.
Warnings.

The referee shall issue a single warning for the following infractions. After the initial warning, if the prohibited conduct persists, a penalty will be issued. The penalty may result in a deduction of points or disqualification.

Holding or grabbing the fence;

Holding opponent’s shorts or gloves; or

The presence of more than one second on the fighting area perimeter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-20.
Fouls.

The following are fouls and will result in penalties if committed:

Butting with the head;

Eye gouging of any kind;

Biting or spitting at an opponent;

Hair pulling;

Fish hooking;

Groin attacks of any kind;

Intentionally placing a finger in any opponent’s orifices;

Downward pointing of elbow strikes;

Small joint manipulation;

Strikes to the spine or back of the head;

Heel kicks to the kidney;

Throat strikes of any kind;

Clawing, pinching, twisting the flesh, or grabbing the clavicle;

Kicking the head of a grounded fighter;

Kneeing the head of a grounded fighter;

Stomping of a grounded fighter;

The use of abusive language in the fighting area;

Any unsportsmanlike conduct that causes an injury to opponent;

Attacking an opponent on or during the break;

Attacking an opponent who is under the referee’s care at the time;

Timidity (avoiding contact, or consistent dropping of mouthpiece, or faking an injury);

Interference from a mixed martial artist’s seconds;

Throwing an opponent out of the fighting area;

Flagrant disregard of the referee’s instructions;

Spiking an opponent to the canvas on his or her head or neck.

Disqualification occurs after any combination of three (3) of the fouls listed in subsection (a) or after a referee determines that a foul was intentional and flagrant.

Fouls will result in a point being deducted by the official scorekeeper from the offending mixed martial artist’s score.

Only a referee can assess a foul. If the referee does not call the foul, judges shall not make that assessment on their own and cannot factor such into their scoring calculations.

A fouled fighter has up to five (5) minutes to recuperate.

If a foul is committed, the referee shall:

Call time;

Check the fouled mixed martial artist’s condition and safety; and

Assess the foul to the offending contestant, deduct points, and notify each corner’s seconds, judges, and official scorekeeper.

If a bottom contestant commits a foul, unless the top contestant is injured, the fight shall continue so as not to jeopardize the top contestant’s superior positioning at the time.

The referee shall verbally notify the bottom contestant of the foul.

When the round is over, the referee shall assess the foul and notify both corners’ seconds, the judges, and the official scorekeeper.

The referee may terminate a bout based on the severity of a foul. For such a flagrant foul, a contestant shall lose by disqualification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-21.
Injuries sustained during competition.

If an injury sustained during competition as a result of a legal maneuver is severe enough to terminate a bout, the injured contestant loses by technical knockout.

If an injury sustained during competition as a result of an intentional foul is severe enough to terminate the bout, the contestant causing the injury loses by disqualification.

If an injury is sustained during competition as a result of an intentional foul and the bout is allowed to continue, the referee shall notify the scorekeeper to automatically deduct two (2) points from the contestant who committed the foul.

If an injury sustained during competition as a result of an intentional foul causes the injured contestant to be unable to continue at a subsequent point in the contest, the injured contestant shall win by technical decision, if he or she is ahead on the score cards. If the injured contestant is even or behind on the score cards at the time of stoppage, the outcome of the bout shall be declared a technical draw.

If a contestant injures himself or herself while attempting to foul his or her opponent, the referee shall take any action in his or her favor, and the injury shall be treated in the same manner as an injury produced by a fair blow.

If an injury sustained during competition as a result of an accidental foul is severe enough for the referee to stop the bout immediately, the bout shall result in a no contest if stopped before two (2) rounds have been completed in a three-round (3) bout or if stopped before three (3) rounds have been completed in a five-round (5) bout.

If an injury sustained during competition as a result of an accidental foul is severe enough for the referee to stop the bout immediately, the bout shall result in a technical decision awarded to the contestant who is ahead on the score cards at the time the bout is stopped only when the bout is stopped after two (2) rounds of the three-round (3) bout, or three (3) rounds of a five-round (5) bout have been completed.

There will be no scoring of an incomplete round. However, if the referee penalizes either contestant, then the appropriate points shall be deducted when the scorekeeper calculates the final score.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-22.
Types of bout results.

The following are the types of bout results:

Submission by:

Tap out: When a contestant physically uses his/her hand to indicate that he or she no longer wishes to continue; or

Verbal tap out: When a contestant verbally announces to the referee that he or she does not wish to continue;

Technical knockout by:

Referee stops bout;

Ringside physician stops bout; or

When an injury as a result of a legal maneuver is severe enough to terminate a bout;

Knockout by failure to rise from the canvas;

Decision via score cards:

Unanimous: When all three (3) judges score the bout for the same contestant;

Split decision: When two (2) judges score the bout for one contestant and one judge scores for the opponent; or

Majority decision: When two (2) judges score the bout for the same contestant and one judge scores a draw;

Draws:

Unanimous — When all three (3) judges score the bout a draw;

Majority — When two (2) judges score the bout a draw; or

Split — When all three (3) judges score differently and the score total results in a draw;

Disqualification: When an injury sustained during competition as a result of an intentional foul is severe enough to terminate the contest;

Forfeit: When a contestant fails to begin competition or prematurely ends the contest for reasons other than injury or by indicating a tap out;

Technical draw: When an injury sustained during competition as a result of an intentional foul causes an injured contestant to be unable to continue and the injured contestant is even or behind on the score cards at the time of stoppage;

Technical decision. When the bout is prematurely stopped due to injury and a contestant is leading on the score cards; and

No contest: When a contest is prematurely stopped due to accidental injury and a sufficient number of rounds have not been completed to render a decision via the score cards.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-23.
Bond procedure.

All mixed martial arts events shall be subject to the bond requirements determined by the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-24.
Inspectors.

All mixed martial arts events shall be subject to the presence, duties, and compensation of inspectors as required by the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-25.
Rules and regulations.

The department of business regulation may make rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this chapter as it may deem necessary. Provided, further, notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, the department of business regulation shall have the power to adopt by rule or regulation, in whole or in part, any standards, rules, regulations, handbooks, or other standards and procedures governing mixed martial arts as approved by the Association of Boxing Commissions. The rules and regulations may also provide for, and regulate the granting of, a special permit for exhibitions where no decision is to be rendered and where skilled mixed martial artists merely demonstrate the science of boxing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 159, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 196, § 2.

41-5.2-26.
Penalty for unlicensed match.

Any person holding, conducting, or participating in any mixed martial arts match or exhibition held without a license, unless exempted as provided herein, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for a term not exceeding three (3) months, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 313, § 1.

41-5.2-27.
Tax on admissions.

Every licensee holding or conducting any professional, mixed martial arts event or exhibition shall, after its conclusion, pay to the general treasurer for the use of the state a sum equal to five percent (5%) of the total gross receipts from the sale of tickets and from admission fees; provided, however, that every licensee holding or conducting a professional, mixed martial arts event or exhibition shall, at its conclusion, pay to the general treasurer a sum equal to five percent (5%) of the gross receipts up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and five percent (5%) of the balance of the gross receipts; provided, further, however, that if the match or exhibition is conducted as an incidental feature in an event or entertainment of a different character, the portion of the total receipts shall be paid to the state as the division of gaming and athletics licensing may determine, or as may be fixed by rule adopted under §

41-5.2-25

. Within seventy-two (72) hours after the conclusion of the match or exhibition, the licensee shall furnish to the division a report, sworn under oath upon the pains and penalties of perjury, showing the exact number of tickets sold and admission fees collected for the contest, and the gross receipts thereof, and other data as the division may require. All fees for licenses and other income of the division shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state. No licensee shall distribute more than fifty (50) complimentary tickets in any one event.

For each match or exhibition, the division, through its inspector and upon the conclusion of the collection of admission fees for the match or exhibition, may examine the box-office admission figures, the admission statements maintained by, or on behalf of, the licensee, and other data as the division may direct. Upon the conclusion of the match or exhibition, the licensee shall tender to the state inspector the sums mentioned in this section. Written acceptance of the tender shall be signed by the inspector and counter signed by the licensee or an agent of the licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 280, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-28.
Suspension or revocation of license.

Any license granted under this chapter may be revoked or suspended by the division of gaming and athletics licensing for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any other law of the state or of any rule or regulation adopted by the division or whenever the licensee has, in the judgment of the division, been guilty of any act or offense detrimental to the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-29.
Physical knockouts.

Any contestant suffering a physical knockout during a mixed martial arts match shall, at the request of his or her manager or the division of gaming and athletics licensing, undergo a magnetic resonant imaging (MRI) or computerized tomography (CT) test scan within twenty-four (24) hours of the request. Failure to comply with the request within the prescribed time shall cause the contestant’s license to be revoked by operation of law and shall render the contestant permanently ineligible for future licensing under this chapter.

The license of any contestant suffering five (5) physical knockouts in any twelve-month (12) period shall be revoked by operation of law and the contestant shall be permanently ineligible for future licensing as a contestant under this chapter.

Every contestant suffering a physical knockout, at the discretion of the division of gaming and athletics licensing, shall be ineligible to perform in a mixed martial arts match licensed under this chapter until sixty (60) days have elapsed following the date of the knockout. The license of every contestant shall be revoked by operation of law whenever he or she suffers a physical knockout.

Every contestant suffering a physical knockout during a mixed martial arts match shall submit to an examination by the physician in attendance immediately following his or her removal from the ring and shall, within two (2) hours of the knockout, submit to a complete examination at a local hospital named by the physician in attendance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

41-5.2-30.
Fees of officials.

The fees of the referee and other licensed officials, as established by this chapter, shall be fixed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, and shall be paid by the licensed organization prior to the exhibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 14, effective June 27, 2022.